Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2010
Act; legislative purpose.

The purpose of the Unauthorized Insurers Process Act is to subject certain insurers to the jurisdiction of courts of this state in suits by or on behalf of insureds or beneficiaries under insurance contracts. The Legislature declares that it is a subject of concern that many residents of this state hold policies of insurance issued or delivered in this state by insurers while such insurers are not authorized to do business in this state, thus presenting to such residents the often insuperable obstacle of resorting to distant forums for the purpose of asserting legal rights under such policies. In furtherance of such state interest, the Legislature exercises its power to protect its residents.

Laws 1949, c. 134, § 1, p. 350;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 54;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-137.01;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 25.

Purpose of this act, entitled Unauthorized Insurers Process Act (§§ 44-137.01 through 44-137.10), is to protect residents of this state from having to resort to distant forums to assert legal rights; act is constitutional. Abel v. Southwest Cas. Ins. Co., 182 Neb. 605, 156 N.W.2d 166 (1968).